Utah statutes.
63I-4a-205.   Board accounting method.

The board by rule made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, shall establish an accounting method that:

(1)  is similar to generally accepted accounting principles used by a private enterprise;

(2)  allows an agency to identify the total actual cost of engaging in a commercial activity in a manner similar to how a private enterprise identifies the total actual cost to the private enterprise, including the following:

(a)  a labor expense, including:

(i)  compensation and benefits;

(ii)  a cost of training;

(iii)  a cost of paying overtime;

(iv)  a cost of supervising labor; or

(v)  another personnel expense;

(b)  an operating cost, including:

(i)  vehicle maintenance and repair;

(ii)  a marketing, advertising, or other sales expense;

(iii)  an office expense;

(iv)  a cost of an accounting operation, including billing;

(v)  an insurance expense;

(vi)  a real estate or equipment cost;

(vii)  a debt service cost; or

(viii)  a proportionate amount of other overhead or of a capital expense, such as vehicle depreciation and depreciation of other fixed assets;

(c)  a contract management cost; and

(d)  another cost particular to a person supplying the good or service; and

(3)  provides a process to estimate the taxes an agency would pay related to engaging in a commercial activity if the agency were required to pay federal, state, and local taxes to the same extent as a private enterprise engaging in the commercial activity.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 325, 2013 General Session

